Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3581
Hospital authority; public corporation; powers.

Whenever it shall be conducive to the public health and welfare, a hospital authority constituting a public corporation and body politic may be established in the manner and having the powers and duties provided in sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.76.